North Dakota statutes. TITLE 61 Waters
CHAPTER 61-04.1 Weather Modification
61-04.1-30.
Abolishment of weather modification authority by election.

When a petition signed by not less than twenty percent of the qualified electors of the county, as determined by the vote cast for governor in the last preceding gubernatorial election, requesting an election upon the abolishment of a weather modification authority as created in sections 61-04.1-27 and 61-04.1-29 is presented to the board of county commissioners, not later than sixty days prior to the next countywide election, the board of county commissioners shall submit the question to the qualified electors of the county at the next countywide election. Upon approval by a majority of the votes cast on the question, the board of county commissioners shall abolish the weather modification authority as of December thirty-first following the election. All unexpended funds remaining in the name of the weather modification authority, after all proper bills and expenses have been paid, shall be deposited in the general fund of the county.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 631, § 30; 1985, ch. 235, § 123; 1997, ch. 108, § 47; 2011, ch. 152, § 45.

61-04.1-31.
Creation of weather modification authority by vote after resolution of county commissioners.

The board of county commissioners of any county may, by resolution after a public hearing, submit the question of the creation of a weather modification authority to the electors of the county at the next countywide election. Upon approval by a majority of the votes cast on the question, the board of county commissioners shall pass a resolution creating a weather modification authority, as described in section 61-04.1-23. Such an authority shall have all powers provided by this chapter, including the authority to levy a tax as provided by section 61-04.1-26.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 631, § 31; 1997, ch. 108, § 48.

61-04.1-32.
County budget may be waived for first appropriation — Conditions.

The provisions of chapter 11-23 shall not apply to appropriations made under the provisions of this chapter. However, immediately after a weather modification authority has been created by resolution of the board of county commissioners, and after certification of a mill levy by the weather modification authority, and only for the initial or first appropriation for the authority, the board of county commissioners may appropriate from moneys, not otherwise appropriated, in the general fund, such moneys as are necessary for carrying out the provisions of this chapter. However, the appropriation shall not exceed an amount equal to what funds would be raised by a seven-mill levy upon the taxable valuation of the property in the county.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 631, § 32; 1983, ch. 593, § 86; 1983, ch. 679, § 4; 1987, ch. 53, § 7.

61-04.1-33.
Bids required — When.

Whenever the board shall undertake to contract with any licensed controller in an amount in excess of ten thousand dollars in any one year, the board shall advertise for proposals for such weather modification activities and, in its proceedings with respect to bids therefor, shall substantially follow the manner and form required by the laws of this state for the purchase of supplies by the office of management and budget. The board shall enter into no contract or agreement for weather modification services except with a controller, holding the permit as required by this chapter, except for the purpose of gathering technical information, and making studies or surveys.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 631, § 33.

61-04.1-34.
Performance bond, cash, or negotiable securities required.

Before the board shall contract with any controller, it shall require the controller to furnish a surety bond or cash or negotiable securities for the faithful performance of the contract in such amount as determined by the board, conditioned that the licensee and the licensee’s agents will in all respects faithfully perform all weather modification contracts undertaken with the board and will comply with all provisions of this chapter and the contract entered into by the board and the licensee.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 631, § 34; 1989, ch. 749, § 1.

61-04.1-35.
Bid bond, cash, or negotiable securities required.

All bids submitted to the board for operations conducted under this chapter shall be accompanied by a separate envelope containing a bidder’s bond or cash or negotiable securities in a sum equal to five percent of the full amount of the bid, executed by the bidder as principal or by a surety company authorized to do business in this state as a guarantee that the bidder will enter into the contract if it is awarded to the bidder.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 631, § 35; 1989, ch. 749, § 2.

61-04.1-36.
State immunity.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to impose or accept any liability or responsibility on the part of this state or any of its agencies, or any state officials or state employees or weather modification authorities for any injury caused by weather modification operations by any person or licensed controller as defined in this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 631, § 36.

61-04.1-37.
Liability of controller.

An operation conducted under the license and permit requirements of this chapter is not an ultrahazardous or abnormally dangerous activity which makes the permittee subject to liability without fault.

Dissemination of materials and substances into the atmosphere by a permittee acting within the conditions and limits of the permittee’s permit shall not constitute trespass.

Except as provided in this section and in section 61-04.1-36, nothing in this chapter shall prevent any person adversely affected by a weather modification operation from recovering damages resulting from negligent or intentionally harmful conduct by a permittee.

The fact that a person holds a license or was issued a permit under this chapter, or that the person has complied with the rules adopted by the board pursuant to this chapter, is not admissible as a defense in any legal action which may be brought against the person.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 631, § 37.

61-04.1-38.
Board may receive and expend funds.

The board may receive and accept in the name of the state any funds that are offered or become available from any federal grant or appropriation, private gift, donation, or bequest, county funds, or funds from any other source except license and permit fees, and to expend these funds for the expense of administering this chapter, and, with the exception of county funds and funds from any other person contracting with the board for weather modification operations, for the encouragement of research and development in weather modification by any private person, the North Dakota state university, the university of North Dakota, or any other appropriate state, county, or public agency in this state by direct grant, contract, or other means.

All federal grants, federal appropriations, private gifts, donations, or bequests, county funds, or funds from any other source except license and permit fees, received by the board must be paid over to the state treasurer, who shall credit this amount to a special fund in the state treasury known as the state weather modification fund. All proceeds deposited by the state treasurer in the state weather modification fund are appropriated to the board and, if expended, must be disbursed by warrant-check prepared by the office of management and budget upon vouchers submitted by the board and must be used for the purpose of paying for the expense of administration of this chapter and, with the exception of county funds or funds from any other person contracting with the board for weather modification operations, for the encouragement of research and development in weather modification by any private person, the North Dakota state university, the university of North Dakota, or any other appropriate state, county, or public agency by direct grant, contract, or other means.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 631, § 38; 1999, ch. 538, § 7.

61-04.1-39.
Payment for weather modification — State to provide funds.

Any weather modification authority or person that contracted with the board for weather modification operations under this chapter shall appropriate to the state weather modification fund the amount determined by the board to be necessary to provide that weather modification authority or person with weather modification operations. The board may expend, from the state weather modification fund, the funds the board deems necessary to provide a contracting weather modification authority or person with weather modification operations.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 631, § 39; 1999, ch. 538, § 8.

61-04.1-40.
State water commission — Compensation — Expenses.

Each member of the North Dakota state water commission shall receive the same compensation paid for other commission duties, for each day actually and necessarily engaged in the performance of official duties in connection with the administration of this chapter. Commission members and employees shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in carrying out their official duties in the same manner and at the same rates as provided by law for state employees.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 631, § 40; 1983, ch. 679, § 5.

61-04.1-41.
Penalty.

Any person contracting for or conducting any weather modification activity without being licensed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, or otherwise violating the provisions of this chapter, shall be guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 631, § 41.

Cross-References.

Penalties for classified offenses, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.